Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-219
Riparian vegetation management; grants; application; procedure.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Eligible purpose means:

(i) The removal of riparian vegetation as part of a vegetation management program, if such vegetation management program is being conducted for the primary objective of improving the conveyance of streamflow in natural streams; and

(ii) The acquisition of equipment that is used for the removal of riparian vegetation described in subdivision (a)(i) of this subsection; and

(b) Qualified applicant means the following entities that provide weed management services in a river basin:

(i) Any weed management entity;

(ii) Any weed control authority; and

(iii) Any natural resources district.

(2) A qualified applicant may apply to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for a grant under this section. No later than January 1, 2027, the department shall prescribe the form for the application.

(3) The department may award a grant to any qualified applicant who applies under this section for an eligible purpose. If the department receives multiple applications under this section, the department shall prioritize awarding grants to the qualified applicants that provide weed management services within an area that is the subject of an interstate compact or decree.

(4) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.

Laws 2026, LB807, § 4.
July 18, 2026